Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.082

Infected or exposed animals—Unlawful to transfer or expose other animals.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to sell, exchange, or give away any animal that he or she knows:

(a) Is infected with any contagious, infectious, or communicable disease;

(b) Has been exposed to any contagious, communicable, or infectious disease within the previous thirty days; or

(c) Has been treated for any condition within the previous thirty days;

without notifying the purchaser or person taking possession of the animal of the infection, exposure, or treatment unless the legal withdrawal period for any treatment has been met or exceeded.

(2) It is unlawful for any owner or person in possession of any animal having any contagious, communicable, or infectious disease to knowingly:

(a) Turn out the animal onto enclosed lands adjoining the enclosed lands of another that are kept for pasture or otherwise used for raising animals without notifying the owner of the enclosed lands; or

(b) Stable the animal or allow the animal to be stabled in any barn with other animals without notifying the other owners.

[ 1998 c 8 s 14; 1927 c 165 s 26; RRS s 3135. Prior: See Reviser's note to RCW 16.44.020. Formerly RCW 16.44.130.]